Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1350.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8-DRESIDENT CARE MONITORING Section 801-D. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to resident care monitoring. Section 802-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718192021 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electronic monitoring device." A surveillance instrument with a fixed position video camera or an audio recording device, or a combination of fixed position video camera or audio recording device, that is installed in a resident's room and broadcasts or records activities or sounds occurring in the room."Facility." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "long-term care nursing facility" is defined in section 802.1."Guardian." A fiduciary who has the care and management of the estate or person of an incapacitated person under the provisions of 20 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 (relating to incapacitated persons). The term includes a health care agent as defined in 20 Pa.C.S. § 5422 (relating to definitions)."Resident." An individual who resides in a facility in this Commonwealth.Section 803-D. Use of electronic monitoring devices.A resident or the guardian of the resident may authorize the installation and use of an electronic monitoring device in the resident's room, as provided under this chapter.Section 804-D. Conditions of consent.(a) Form.--(1) A resident or the guardian of the resident who authorizes the installation of an electronic monitoring device in a facility shall notify the facility on an electronic monitoring device authorization form prescribed by the department and provided by the facility to the resident and, if applicable, the guardian of the resident . (2) The form in paragraph (1) shall:20250HB1350PN1538 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Require the resident or the guardian of the resident to choose whether the electronic monitoring device should always be unobstructed or whether the camera should be obstructed in specified circumstances to protect the dignity of the resident.(ii) Specify that the consent of other residents residing in the same room as the resident must be obtained regarding the use of the electronic monitoring device.(iii) Include:(A) An explanation of this article. (B) An acknowledgment that the resident or resident's guardian has consented to the installation and use of the electronic monitoring device in the resident's room.(C) For a resident who lives in a room with another resident, an acknowledgment that the other resident or other resident's guardian has consented to the installation and use of the electronic monitoring device and a description of any conditions placed on that consent.(D) A section for providing the facility with information regarding the type, function and use of the electronic monitoring device to be installed and used.(E) A section stating that the facility is released from liability in a civil or criminal action or administrative proceeding for a violation of the resident's right to privacy in connection with using the electronic monitoring device.20250HB1350PN1538 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) An acknowledgment that the resident is responsible for the installation, removal and maintenance costs, including Internet service costs and network access costs associated with using an electronic monitoring device.(G) An acknowledgment that an electronic monitoring device may not be used until the required consent of all residents in the room has been obtained.(b) Written consent.--Subject to subsection (c), written consent for an electronic monitoring device in a facility shall be given only by:(1) A resident who has capacity to sign the consent form.(2) The guardian of the resident, if the resident has been judicially declared to lack capacity required to sign the consent form.(c) Residents occupying same room.-- (1) Prior to the use of the electronic monitoring device, written consent shall be given by each other resident, or the guardian of each other resident, who resides in the same room as the resident for whom an electronic monitoring device in a facility is being used.(2) Another resident who resides in the same room as the resident for whom an electronic monitoring device in a facility is being used may: (i) If the electronic monitoring device is a video surveillance camera, condition consent on the camera being pointed away from the resident residing in the same room or in private areas of the room. 20250HB1350PN1538 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Revoke that resident's consent at any time, if the revocation is in writing. The revocation of consent shall be kept on file at the facility on a form prescribed by the department. A copy of the form shall be given to the resident and, if applicable, the guardian of the resident.(3) The written consent under paragraph (1) shall include that the facility is released from liability in a civil or criminal action or administrative proceeding for a violation of the resident's right to privacy in connection with using the electronic monitoring device.(d) Discrimination prohibited.--Neither a prospective resident nor a resident may be denied admission to or discharged from a facility or be otherwise discriminated against or retaliated against for consenting to use an electronic monitoring device . (e) Requests for room changes.--A facility shall make every effort to accommodate a resident or the guardian of the resident desiring to utilize an electronic monitoring device to move to another room if the resident or guardian of the resident requests a room change within a reasonable amount of time. A facility may not be cited by the department if the facility cannot accommodate a room change requested for this purpose.(f) Guardians.--The guardian of a resident shall provide:(1) The guardian's name, address and telephone number.(2) Documentation establishing the guardianship.Section 805-D. Notice.(a) Main entrances.--A facility shall post at or near its main entrances a sign that clearly states that electronic monitoring devices may be in use in the facility.20250HB1350PN1538 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Residents' rooms.--Additional notice shall be displayed at the entrance of the room of a resident with an electronic monitoring device stating that the room is being monitored and operation.Section 806-D. Placement and operation.(a) Fixed position and limitation.--An electronic monitoring device shall be placed in a fixed position and in a conspicuous location. An electronic monitoring device may not be placed in a bathroom.(b) Capabilities.--An electronic monitoring device shall be capable of being temporarily turned on and off.Section 807-D. Admission or discharge.An individual or resident may not be denied admission to or discharged from a facility or discriminated or retaliated against because of the decision to authorize the installation and use of an electronic monitoring device in a resident's room in the facility.Section 808-D. Obstruction or interception.(a) Obstruction.--An individual, other than the resident or resident's guardian who authorized the installation and use of an electronic monitoring device in the resident's room in a facility, may not intentionally obstruct, tamper with or destroy the electronic monitoring device or a recording made by the electronic monitoring device.(b) Viewing.--Except as provided under subsection (c), an individual, other than the following, may not intentionally view or listen to the images displayed or sounds recorded by an electronic monitoring device installed in a resident's room:(1) The resident.(2) The resident's guardian.20250HB1350PN1538 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Law enforcement personnel.(c) Authorization.--A resident or resident's guardian may authorize an individual to view or listen to the images displayed or sounds recorded by an electronic monitoring device installed in a resident's room.(d) Limitation.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, images displayed or sounds recorded by an electronic monitoring device installed in a resident's room may not be shared with a third party or on the Internet.Section 809-D. Fines and offenses . (a) Fine.--An individual who violates section 808-D shall be fined $100 for a first offense. For each subsequent offense, the violator shall be fined $500.(b) Criminal offense.-- A violation of section 808-D shall constitute a misdemeanor of the first degree. An individual or entity that intentionally or knowingly hampers, obstructs, tampers with or destroys a recording or an electronic monitoring device installed in a facility shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in 18 Pa.C.S. § 4910 (relating to tampering with or fabricating physical evidence) as it relates to tampering of physical evidence.Section 810-D. Exceptions to prohibition of interception and disclosure of communications. It shall not be unlawful and prior court approval shall not be required under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 57 (relating to wiretapping and electronic surveillance) for:(1) A resident of a facility who has consented to the installation and use of an electronic monitoring device in the resident's room under this chapter for purposes of listening to the sounds and audio recordings from the 20250HB1350PN1538 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronic monitoring device.(2) The guardian of a resident of a facility who has consented to the installation of an electronic monitoring device in the resident's room under this chapter for purposes of listening to the sounds and audio recordings from the electronic monitoring device.Section 811-D. Regulations and applicability. (a) Regulations.--(1) The department may , in consultation with the Department of Aging, the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, representatives of licensed long-term care service providers and other aging advocates, promulgate regulations to implement this chapter . (2) The department shall promulgate regulations prescribing the place or places that the forms under this section shall be maintained and the period for which the forms shall be maintained.(b) Effect of chapter.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to supersede Federal authority regarding facilities or prevent the department from taking necessary actions to render the Commonwealth eligible for Federal funds or reimbursement services provided in facilities.(c) Law enforcement.--This chapter shall not apply if an electronic monitoring device is installed by a law enforcement agency and used solely for a bona fide law enforcement purpose.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1350PN1538 - 8 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526